District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

47-1801.05

Effect of repeal or amendment.

Transferred.

Horizontal property regimes, tax exemptions, classification, see § 42-2016.
Section 5(a) of D.C. Law 7-29 redesignated this section as § 47-1801.1a (§ 47-1801.01a, 2001 Ed.).